Utah statutes.
32A-1-103 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Exercise of police powers.

This title is an exercise of the police powers of the state for the protection of the public health, peace, safety, welfare, and morals and regulates the sale, service, storage, manufacture, distribution, and consumption of alcoholic products.

